Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Preliminary Provisions

271A.005.
Title. [Renumbered as KRS 271B.1-010.]

271A.010.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

271A.015.
Application and purposes. [Repealed.]

271A.020.
General powers. [Repealed.]

271A.025.
Indemnification of officers, directors, employees and agents. [Repealed.]

271A.026.
Indemnification of directors. [Repealed.]

271A.030.
Right of corporation to acquire and dispose of its own shares. [Repealed.]

271A.035.
Defense of ultra vires. [Repealed.]

271A.040.
Corporate name. [Repealed.]

271A.045.
Reserved name. [Repealed.]

271A.050.
Registered name. [Repealed.]

271A.055.
Renewal of registered name. [Repealed.]

271A.060.
Registered office and registered agent. [Repealed.]

271A.065.
Change of registered office or registered agent. [Repealed.]

271A.070.
Service of process on corporation. [Repealed.]

271A.075.
Authorized shares. [Repealed.]

271A.080.
Issuance of shares of preferred or special classes in series. [Repealed.]

271A.085.
Subscriptions for shares. [Repealed.]

271A.090.
Consideration for shares. [Repealed.]

271A.095.
Payment for shares. [Repealed.]

271A.100.
Stock rights and options. [Repealed.]

271A.105.
Determination of amount of stated capital. [Repealed.]

271A.110.
Expenses of organization, reorganization and financing. [Repealed.]

271A.115.
Certificates representing shares. [Repealed.]

271A.120.
Fractional shares. [Repealed.]

271A.125.
Liability of subscribers and shareholders. [Repealed.]

271A.130.
Shareholders’ preemptive rights. [Repealed.]

271A.135.
By-laws and other powers in emergency. [Repealed.]

271A.140.
Meetings of shareholders. [Repealed.]

271A.145.
Notice of shareholders’ meetings. [Repealed.]

271A.150.
Closing of transfer books and fixing record date. [Repealed.]

271A.155.
Voting record. [Repealed.]

271A.160.
Quorum of shareholders. [Repealed.]

271A.165.
Voting of shares. [Repealed.]

271A.170.
Voting trusts and agreements among shareholders. [Repealed.]

271A.175.
Board of directors. [Repealed.]

271A.180.
Number and election of directors. [Repealed.]

271A.185.
Classification of directors. [Repealed.]

271A.190.
Vacancies. [Repealed.]

271A.195.
Removal of directors. [Repealed.]

271A.200.
Quorum of directors. [Repealed.]

271A.202.
General standards for directors. [Renumbered as KRS 271B.8-300.]

271A.205.
Director conflicts of interest. [Repealed.]

271A.206.
Director conflict of interest. [Renumbered as KRS 271B.8-310.]

271A.210.
Executive and other committees. [Repealed.]

271A.215.
Directors’ meetings — Conduct of meetings via telephone or similar communications equipment. [Repealed.]

271A.220.
Action by directors without a meeting. [Repealed.]

271A.225.
Dividends. [Repealed.]

271A.230.
Distributions from capital surplus. [Repealed.]

271A.235.
Loans to employes and directors. [Repealed.]

271A.240.
Liability of directors in certain cases. [Repealed.]

271A.245.
Provisions relating to actions by shareholders. [Repealed.]

271A.250.
Officers. [Repealed.]

271A.255.
Removal of officers. [Repealed.]

271A.257.
Standards of conduct for officers. [Renumbered as KRS 271B.8-420.]

271A.260.
Books and records. [Repealed.]

271A.265.
Incorporators. [Repealed.]

271A.270.
Articles of incorporation. [Repealed.]

271A.271.
Articles of incorporation. [Renumbered as KRS 271B.2-020.]

271A.275.
Filing of articles of incorporation. [Repealed.]

271A.280.
Effect of issuance of certificate of incorporation. [Repealed.]

271A.285.
Organization meeting of directors. [Repealed.]

271A.290.
Right to amend articles of incorporation. [Repealed.]

271A.295.
Amendment of articles. [Repealed.]

271A.300.
Class voting on amendments. [Repealed.]

271A.305.
Articles of amendment. [Repealed.]

271A.310.
Filing of articles of amendment. [Repealed.]

271A.315.
Effect of certificate of amendment. [Repealed.]

271A.320.
Restated articles of incorporation. [Repealed.]

271A.325.
Amendment of articles of incorporation in reorganization proceedings. [Repealed.]

271A.330.
Restriction on redemption or purchase of redeemable shares. [Repealed.]

271A.335.
Cancellation of redeemable shares by redemption or purchase. [Repealed.]

271A.340.
Cancellation of other reacquired shares. [Repealed.]

271A.345.
Reduction of stated capital in certain cases. [Repealed.]

271A.350.
Special provisions relating to surplus and reserves. [Repealed.]

271A.355.
Procedure for merger. [Repealed.]

271A.360.
Procedure for consolidation. [Repealed.]

271A.365.
Approval by shareholders. [Repealed.]

271A.370.
Articles of merger on consolidation. [Repealed.]

271A.375.
Merger of subsidiary corporation. [Repealed.]

271A.380.
Effect of merger or consolidation. [Repealed.]

271A.385.
Merger or consolidation of domestic and foreign corporations. [Repealed.]

271A.390.
Sale of assets in regular course of business and mortgage or pledge of assets. [Repealed.]

271A.395.
Sale of assets other than in regular course of business. [Repealed.]

271A.396.
Definitions for KRS 271B.12-210 to 271B.12-230. [Renumbered as KRS 271B.12-200.]

271A.397.
Minimum share vote requirements for approval of business combinations — Limitations on business corporation. [Renumbered as KRS 271B.12-210.]

271A.398.
Exemptions from minimum share vote requirements. [Renumbered as KRS 271B.12-220.]

271A.399.
KRS 271B.12-200 to 271B.12-220 prevail over other provisions of KRS Chapter 271B — Severability of provisions. [Renumbered as KRS 271B.12-230.]

271A.400.
Right of shareholders to dissent. [Repealed.]

271A.405.
Rights of dissenting shareholders. [Repealed.]

271A.410.
Voluntary dissolution by incorporators. [Repealed.]

271A.415.
Voluntary dissolution by consent of shareholders. [Repealed.]

271A.420.
Voluntary dissolution by act of corporation. [Repealed.]

271A.425.
Filing of statement of intent to dissolve. [Repealed.]

271A.430.
Effect of statement of intent to dissolve. [Repealed.]

271A.435.
Procedure after filing of statement of intent to dissolve. [Repealed.]

271A.440.
Revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings by consent of shareholders. [Repealed.]

271A.445.
Revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings by act of corporation. [Repealed.]

271A.450.
Filing of statement of revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings. [Repealed.]

271A.455.
Effect of statement of revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings. [Repealed.]

271A.460.
Articles of dissolution. [Repealed.]

271A.465.
Filing of articles of dissolution. [Repealed.]

271A.470.
Involuntary dissolution. [Repealed.]

271A.475.
Jurisdiction of court to liquidate assets and business of corporation. [Repealed.]

271A.480.
Procedure in liquidation of corporation by court. [Repealed.]

271A.485.
Qualifications of receivers. [Repealed.]

271A.490.
Filing of claims in liquidation proceedings. [Repealed.]

271A.495.
Discontinuance of liquidation proceedings. [Repealed.]

271A.500.
Decree of involuntary dissolution. [Repealed.]

271A.505.
Filing of decree of dissolution. [Repealed.]

271A.510.
Deposit with department of revenue of amount due certain shareholders. [Repealed.]

271A.515.
Survival of remedy after dissolution. [Repealed.]

271A.520.
Admission of foreign corporation. [Repealed.]

271A.525.
Powers of foreign corporation. [Repealed.]

271A.530.
Corporate name of foreign corporation. [Repealed.]

271A.535.
Change of name by foreign corporation. [Repealed.]

271A.540.
Application for certificate of authority. [Repealed.]

271A.545.
Filing of application for certificate of authority. [Repealed.]

271A.550.
Effect of certificate of authority. [Repealed.]

271A.555.
Registered office and registered agent of foreign corporation. [Repealed.]

271A.560.
Change of registered office or registered agent of foreign corporation. [Repealed.]

271A.565.
Service of process on foreign corporation. [Repealed.]

271A.570.
Amendment to articles of incorporation of foreign corporation. [Repealed.]

271A.575.
Merger of foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state. [Repealed.]

271A.580.
Amended certificate of authority. [Repealed.]

271A.585.
Withdrawal of foreign corporation. [Repealed.]

271A.590.
Filing of application for withdrawal. [Repealed.]

271A.595.
Revocation of certificate of authority. [Repealed.]

271A.600.
Issuance of certificate of revocation. [Repealed.]

271A.605.
Application to corporations heretofore authorized to transact business in this state. [Repealed.]

271A.610.
Transacting business without certificate of authority. [Repealed.]

271A.615.
Annual report of domestic and foreign corporations — Reinstatement of certificate of incorporation. [Repealed.]

271A.620.
Filing of annual report of domestic and foreign corporations. [Repealed.]

271A.625.
Fees and charges to be collected by secretary of state. [Repealed.]

271A.630.
Fees for filing documents and issuing certificates. [Repealed.]

271A.631.
Fees for filing documents and issuing certificates — Miscellaneous charges. [Renumbered as KRS 271B.1-220.]

271A.635.
Miscellaneous charges. [Repealed.]

271A.640.
Penalties imposed upon corporations. [Repealed.]

271A.645.
Certificates and certified copies to be received in evidence. [Repealed.]

271A.650.
Forms to be furnished by Secretary of State. [Repealed.]

271A.655.
Greater voting requirements. [Repealed.]

271A.660.
Waiver of notice. [Repealed.]

271A.665.
Action by shareholders without a meeting. [Repealed.]

271A.670.
Unauthorized assumption of corporate powers. [Repealed.]

271A.675.
Application to existing corporations. [Repealed.]

271A.680.
Effect of repeal of prior acts. [Repealed.]

271A.685.
Validity of facsimile signature for corporation debt security. [Renumbered as KRS 271B.18-010.]

271A.690.
Retroactive validation of existing domestic corporations. [Renumbered as KRS 271B.18-020.]

271A.695.
Acceptance of present Constitution. [Renumbered as KRS 271B.18-030.]

271A.700.
Purpose of filing articles of incorporation. [Renumbered as KRS 271B.18-040.]

271A.705.
Limitation on business and holding of real estate; escheat. [Repealed.]

271A.710.
Revocation of charters and grants since 1856. [Renumbered as KRS 271B.18-050.]

271A.715.
Incorporation for purposes of establishing a foreign trade zone within this state. [Renumbered as KRS 271B.18-060.]